Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.16.050

Precincts—Restrictions on precinct boundaries—Designated by number.

(1) Every voting precinct must be wholly within a single congressional district, a single legislative district, a single district of a county legislative authority, and, if applicable, a single city.

(2) Every voting precinct shall be composed, as nearly as practicable, of contiguous and compact areas.

(3) Except as provided in this subsection, changes to the boundaries of any precinct shall follow visible, physical features delineated on the most current maps provided by the United States census bureau. A change need not follow such visible, physical features if (a) it is necessitated by an annexation or incorporation and the proposed precinct boundary is identical to an exterior boundary of the annexed or incorporated area which does not follow a visible, physical feature; or (b) doing so would substantially impair election administration in the involved area.

(4) After a change to precinct boundaries is adopted by the county legislative authority, if the change does not follow visible physical features, the county auditor shall send to the secretary of state an electronic or paper copy of the description, a map or maps of the changes, and a statement of the applicable exception under subsection (3) of this section. For boundary changes made pursuant to subsection (3)(b) of this section, the auditor shall include a statement of the reasons why following visible, physical features would have substantially impaired election administration.

(5) Every voting precinct within each county shall be designated by number for the purpose of preparation of maps and the tabulation of population for apportionment purposes. These precincts may be identified with names or other numbers for other election purposes.

(6) After a change to precinct boundaries in a city or town, the county auditor shall send one copy of the map or maps delineating the new precinct boundaries within that city or town to the city or town clerk.

(7) Precinct maps are public records and shall be available for inspection by the public during normal office hours in the offices where they are kept. Copies shall be made available to the public for a fee necessary to cover the cost of reproduction.

[ 2003 c 111 s 405; 1999 c 298 s 1; 1989 c 278 s 1; 1977 ex.s. c 128 s 2; 1965 c 9 s 29.04.050. Prior: 1921 c 178 s 1, part; 1915 c 11 s 1, part; 1907 c 130 s 1, part; 1889 p 402 s 7, part; Code 1881 s 3067, part; 1865 p 30 s 1, part; RRS s 5171, part. Formerly RCW 29.04.050.]

NOTES:

Severability—1977 ex.s. c 128: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.